Georgia, session 2025_26, HB411.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Act creating a board of commissioners for Banks County, approved August 19, 1916
(Ga. L. 1916, p. 349), as amended, particularly by an Act approved February 17, 2022
(Ga. L. 2022, p. 4500), is amended by revising Section 2 as follows:
"SECTION 2.
(a) For the purpose of electing members of the board of commissioners, Banks County
shall be divided into five commissioner districts. Commissioner Districts 1, 2, 3, and 4
H. B. 411 (SUB)
- 1 -

LC 47 3430S
shall be and correspond to those four numbered districts described in Appendix A, attached
to and made a part of this Act and further identified as 'User: Banks CC Plan Name:
BanksCC-2025 Plan Type: Local'. Commissioner District 5 shall be comprised of the
entire geographic area of Banks County and the person elected from such district shall
serve as the chairperson of the board of commissioners.
(b)(1) For the purposes of such plan:
(A) The term 'VTD' shall mean and describe the same geographical boundaries as
provided in the report of the Bureau of the Census for the United States decennial
census of 2020 for the State of Georgia. The separate numeric designations in a district
description which are underneath a VTD heading shall mean and describe individual
Blocks within a VTD as provided in the report of the Bureau of the Census for the
United States decennial census of 2020 for the State of Georgia; and
(B) Except as otherwise provided in the description of any district, whenever the
description of any district refers to a named city, it shall mean the geographical
boundaries of that city as shown on the census maps for the United States decennial
census of 2020 for the State of Georgia.
(2) Any part of Banks County which is not included in any district described in
subsection (a) of this section shall be included within that district contiguous to such part
which contains the least population according to the United States decennial census
of 2020 for the State of Georgia.
(3) Any part of Banks County which is described in subsection (a) of this section as
being included in a particular district shall nevertheless not be included within such
district if such part is not contiguous to such district. Such noncontiguous part shall
instead be included within that district contiguous to such part which contains the least
population according to the United States decennial census of 2020 for the State of
Georgia."
H. B. 411 (SUB)
- 2 -

LC 47 3430S
SECTION 2.
(a) Those members of the Board of Commissioners of Banks County who are serving as
such on the effective date of this Act and any person selected to fill a vacancy in any such
office shall continue to serve as such members until the regular expiration of their respective
terms of office and upon the election and qualification of their respective successors.
(b) Commissioner Districts 1, 2, 3, and 4, as they exist immediately prior to the effective
date of this Act, shall continue to be designated as Commissioner Districts 1, 2, 3, and 4,
respectively, but as newly described under this Act, and on and after the effective date of this
Act, such members of the board serving from those former commissioner districts shall be
deemed to be serving from and representing their respective districts as newly described
under this Act.
SECTION 3.
This Act shall become effective upon its approval by the Governor or upon its becoming law
without such approval.
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 411 (SUB)
- 3 -

LC 47 3430S
APPENDIX A
User: Banks CC
Plan Name: BanksCC-2025
Plan Type: Local
District 001
County Banks GA
VTD 0110004 - BUSHVILLE
Block 970200
3051 3060
Block 970300
2002 2003 2004 2045 2046 2047 2048 2049 2050 2051 2052 2053
2054 2055 2057 2058 2059 2060
Block 970400
1014 1017 1018 1019 1020 1025 1026 1027 1028 1029 1030 1031
2000 2001 2002 2003 2004 2005 2006 2007 2008 2009 2010 2011
2012 2013 2014 2015 2016 2017 2018 2019 2020 2021 2022 2023
2024 2025 2026 2027 2028 2029 2030 2031 2032 2033 2034 2035
2036 2037 2038 2039 2048 2049 2060 2061 2062 2063 2064 2065
2066 2067 2068 2069 2070 2071 2072 2073 2074 2075
VTD 0110006 - DAVIDS
VTD 0110013 - WILMONTS
Block 970200
2036 2037 2038 2039 2040 2041 2042 2043 2044 2045 2046 2047
2051 2054 3000 3001 3002 3003 3004 3005 3006 3007 3010 3011
3012 3013 3018 3019 3020 3021
H. B. 411 (SUB)
- 4 -

LC 47 3430S
District 002
County Banks GA
VTD 0110002 - BALDWIN
VTD 0110003 - BERLIN
VTD 0110005 - COLUMBIA
VTD 0110007 - GOLDEN HILL
Block 970100
4017 4018 4019 4020 4021
Block 970200
1001 1004 1020 1021
VTD 0110009 - HOLLINGSWORTH
VTD 0110012 - WASHINGTON
District 003
County Banks GA
VTD 0110007 - GOLDEN HILL
Block 970100
1000 1001 1002 1003 1004 1005 1006 1007 1008 1009 1010 1011
1012 1013 1014 1015 1016 1017 1018 1033 1034 1035 1036 1037
100 1040 1041 1042 1043 1044 1045 1047 4000 4001 4002 4003 4004
101 4005 4007 4008 4009 4010 4014 4015 4016 4022 4023 4030
102 VTD 0110008 - GROVE RIVER
103 VTD 0110011 - POPLAR SPRINGS
104 District 004
105 County Banks GA
106 VTD 0110001 - ANDERSON
H. B. 411 (SUB)
- 5 -

LC 47 3430S
107 VTD 0110004 - BUSHVILLE
108 Block 970200
109 3059
110 VTD 0110010 - HOMER
111 VTD 0110013 - WILMONTS
112 Block 970200
113 3008 3009 3014 3015 3016 3017
H. B. 411 (SUB)
- 6 -